Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20267-203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Act:

(1) Board means the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Board;

(2) Designated legal profession shortage area means a rural area located within any county in Nebraska having a population of less than seventy-five thousand inhabitants and determined by the board to be underserved by available legal representation;

(3) Educational loans means loans received as an educational benefit, scholarship, or stipend toward a juris doctorate degree and either (a) made, insured, or guaranteed by a governmental unit or (b) made under a program funded in whole or in part by a governmental unit or nonprofit institution; and

(4) Public legal service means providing legal service to indigent persons while employed by a tax-exempt charitable organization.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 21;

Laws 2014, LB907, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 1.
July 18, 2026